Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.040

Distribution of decedent's property.

Property which would have passed to or for the benefit of the slayer or abuser by devise or legacy from the decedent shall be distributed as if he or she had predeceased the decedent.

[ 2009 c 525 s 5; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.040. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 4.]